Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 28

Ginseng Dealers

62-28-101. Registration and permit requirements.

Any ginseng dealer who purchases ginseng collected in this state shall register with the department of environment and conservation and obtain a ginseng dealer permit from the department.

Acts 1983, ch. 445, § 1.

Cross-References. Ginseng harvest season, title 70, ch. 8, part 2.

Rare plant protection and conservation, title 70, ch. 8, part 3.

62-28-102. Monthly records — Annual report.

Each registered ginseng dealer shall submit monthly purchase records for the period of September 1 through March 31 of each year and an annual report of purchases and sales of ginseng.

Acts 1983, ch. 445, § 2; 1988, ch. 782, § 1; 2012, ch. 591, § 2.

62-28-103. Ginseng export certificate.

Any ginseng dealer who exports or sells to another ginseng dealer shall attach a Tennessee ginseng export certificate with each sale of ginseng roots. The information on this certificate must be verified and signed by a representative of the department of environment and conservation, except where otherwise specified in reciprocal agreements with neighboring ginseng exporting states.

Acts 1983, ch. 445, § 3; 1988, ch. 782, § 3.

62-28-104. Regulations.

The commissioner of environment and conservation may promulgate regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this chapter. The commissioner may establish, by regulation, fees for the registration of dealers and issuance of permits in amounts sufficient to pay the approximate cost of administering the registration and permit program. The commissioner may not promulgate any rule or regulation concerning the planting, harvesting or selling of ginseng that is more restrictive than that required by the United States department of the interior, fish and wildlife service, in order that ginseng may be eligible for exportation.

Acts 1983, ch. 445, § 4; 1985, ch. 170, § 1.

62-28-105. Violations.

A violation of §§ 62-28-102 — 62-28-104 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1983, ch. 445, § 5; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-28-106. Annual disposition of roots.

All ginseng roots remaining in the possession of a ginseng dealer on March 31 of each year must be weighed and receipted by a department of environment and conservation representative.

Acts 1988, ch. 782, § 2.

62-28-107. Agreements with neighboring states.

The commissioner of environment and conservation is authorized to enter into agreements with neighboring ginseng exporting states for the purpose of facilitating the trade of ginseng by and between this state and those states.

Acts 1988, ch. 782, § 4.